Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1483.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 493(27) of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended to read:Section 493. Unlawful Acts Relative to Liquor, Malt and Brewed Beverages and Licensees.--The term "licensee," when used in this section, shall mean those persons licensed under the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 provisions of Article IV, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.It shall be unlawful--* * *(27) Distributors and Importing Distributors Employing Minors. [For] Notwithstanding the provisions of the act of October 24, 2012 (P.L.1209, No.151), known as the "Child Labor Act," for any distributor or importing distributor to employ minors under the age of [eighteen but persons] sixteen. Persons between the ages of sixteen and eighteen may be employed to work within the licensed premises but may not sell malt and brewed beverages. Persons aged eighteen and over may be employed to sell and deliver malt and brewed beverages.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1483PN1737 - 2 - 123456789101112131415